Arkansas, session 2025, HB1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-711, concerning administration of
medication for diabetes in schools, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) If a school district provides educational information on
immunizations, infectious diseases, medications, or other school health
issues to parents and guardians of students in kindergarten through grade
twelve (K-12), the following educational information about Type 1 and Type 2
diabetes shall be included:
(A) A description of Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes;
(B) A description of the risk factors and warning signs
associated with Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes;
(C) A recommendation to the parent or guardian of a
student displaying warning signs associated with Type 1 or Type 2 diabetes
that the parent or guardian consult with the student's primary care provider
*JMB218*
03-19-2025 15:02:06 JMB218

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1580
to determine if immediate screening for Type 1 or Type 2 diabetes is
appropriate;
(D) A description of the screening processes for both Type
1 and Type 2 diabetes and of the significance of the stages of Type 1
diabetes; and
(E) A recommendation that, following a Type 1 or Type 2
diabetes diagnosis, the parent or guardian consult with the student's primary
care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan.
(2) The Department of Education, in cooperation with the
Department of Health, shall develop and make available the educational
information about Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes to school districts and on the
website of each department.
(3) Diabetes-related educational information provided by school
districts to parents and guardians of students as required by this subsection
is solely for the purposes of educational information and shall not be
considered or construed to be for the purposes of providing a medical
diagnosis.

/s/Gramlich

















03-19-2025 15:02:06 JMB218